Hawaii, session 2026, GM1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§132- State fire code; county amendments; minimum
standards. (a) The state fire code adopted pursuant to section
132-3 shall constitute the minimum statewide standard for fire
and life safety.
(b) No county shall adopt, amend, or enforce any
ordinance, rule, or code provision that is less restrictive than
the state fire code.
(c) A county may propose amendments to the state fire code
only where the amendments are equally or more restrictive than
the state fire code and are necessary to address unique local
conditions.
(d) All amendments proposed by a county shall be submitted
to the office of the state fire marshal for review and approval
before adoption or enforcement.
2026-2429 SB2645 CDl SMA.docx
■iwmiiniiiniiiiiiNi

Page 2 S.B. NO. "
C.D. 1
(e) The office of the state fire marshal shall review
proposed amendments for consistency with statewide fire and life
safety objectives, statutory authority, and nationally
recognized standards, and shall approve, approve with
conditions, or deny the proposed amendments in writing.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
the authority of the office of the state fire marshal to provide
technical assistance, guidance, or model amendments to counties.
§132- State fire and life safety special fund. (a)
There is established in the state treasury the state fire and
life safety special fund, which shall be administered by the
office of the state fire marshal.
(b) The following shall be deposited into the special
fund:
(1) Federal, state, county, and private grants;
(2) Gifts, donations, bequests, and contributions from
public or private sources;
(3) Rebates, reimbursements, settlements, or cost
recoveries related to fire and life safety activities;
(4) Any interest earned or accrued on the moneys in the
special fund; and
2026-2429 SB2645 GDI SMA.docx 2
milllMlilllMIHIIIIIII

Page 3 S.B. NO. 25*3
C.D. 1
(5) Moneys appropriated by the legislature.
(c) Moneys in the special fund shall be expended by the
office of the state fire marshal, with the support of the
department of law enforcement pursuant to part II of this
chapter, for the following purposes:
(1) Fire and life safety code administration,
implementation, and enforcement support;
(2) Fire prevention, wildfire mitigation, and community
risk reduction programs;
(3) Trainiui£j educatdon2 cert2^rica;tion j and£rofess2^on^
development, including scholarships and workforce
development initiatives;
(4) Planniu22r_££sear;ch_j__dat^_collectdon_j__and_^d^
assessments related to fire and life safety;
(5) Public outreach, technical assistance, and
intergovernmental coordination; and
(6) Any other purposes consistent with the duties of the
office of the state fire marshal.
(d) Expenditures from the special fund shall comply with
all applicable state procurement, accounting, and fiscal control
laws.
2026-2429 SB2645 CDl SMA.docx
■imiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiaiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(e) Moneys in the special fund shall not lapse to the
general fund at the end of any fiscal year.
(f) The state fire marshal shall include information on
deposits to and expenditures from the special fund in the office
of the state fire marshal's annual report or other reports
required by law."
SECTION 2. Section 132-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) Each county fire chief, in person or by officers or
members of the fire chief's fire department designated by the
fire chief for that purpose, shall inspect all buildings[—] a^
premises, [and public thoroughfares,] except the interiors of
private dwellings and state facilities, for the purpose of
ascertaining and causing to be corrected any conditions liable
to cause fire or any violation of any law, ordinance, rule, or
order relating to fire hazard or to the prevention of fires.
(b) The inspection shall be made at least once every five
years, or as often as deemed practicable or necessary by the
county fire chief, at all other buildings and premises to
provide fire prevention and pre-fire planning within the
jurisdiction of the county fire chief. The office of the state
2026-2429 SB2645 GDI SMA.docx
■BHiMniniiiiDiiiiiniiii

Page 5
S.B. NO. SS?*
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
fire marshal shall conduct fire and safety inspections at all
state facilities [at least once a year.] with inspection
frequencies not to exceed once every three years, determined by
assessed risk and occupancy classification.”
SECTION 3. Act 302, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is
amended by amending section 18 to read as follows:
"SECTION 18. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,212,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 in the following manner:
(1) For fiscal year 2025-2026:
(A) $206,352 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for the state fire marshal;
(B) $189,804 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one deputy state fire marshal;
(C) $40,248 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one office assistant IV;
[4^ $160/000 for two full-time equivalent—(2'jO FTE)
peaitiefis—fire-arftspeetees-r
2026-2429 SB2645 CDl SMA.docx 5
nillllillHIIIIIHIIilMi

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
I $240,000 for three full-time oquiva-lont—(3-. 0—FfE)
pes4rfeieft9-^ea?--fi-r€--^riwe&tiqefeef"s-,—ctR4]
(D) $400,000 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE)
gositl^ns^o£ass i^t^nt flre ma^cshaj^^2 and
[-HF4-] JAL $1,375, 596 for the operations, costs,
equipment, and expenses of the office of the
state fire marshal; and
(2) For fiscal year 2026-2027:
(A) $214,608 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for the state fire marshal;
(B) $197,400 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one deputy state fire marshal;
(C) $40,248 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one office assistant IV;
[4-^ $160,000 fer-two full-time—cqui-vciient—(2.0 FTE)
poeit-ions—for fire inopccfeors;
$240,000 f-or-throe full-ttmo-Gquiva-lcnt—(-3.0 FTE)
pooitiong -fog fire invcoti-gator-G;—
JAL $400,000 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE)
positions for assistant fire marshals; and
2026-2429 SB2645 GDI SMA.docx 6
nniiniiigiiiniiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 7 2645
S.B. NO.
S.D. 3
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
[-(^] (E) $1,359,744 for operations, costs, equipment,
and expenses of the office of the state fire
marshal.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2429 SB2645 CDl SMA.docx 7
IlillllllillinillllllMIIIHH

S.B. NO.
^3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI

S.B. No. 2645, S.D. 3, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
138-26

SB No. 2645, SD 3, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives